Idaho, session 2025, S1029.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 1-808, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
1-808. SEVENTH DISTRICT -- NUMBER OF JUDGES -- RESIDENT CHAMBERS. (1)
The seventh judicial district shall consist of the counties of Lemhi,
Custer, Butte, Clark, Fremont, Jefferson, Madison, Teton, Bonneville and
Bingham.
(2) The seventh judicial district shall have six (6) seven (7) district
judges.
(3) Resident chambers of the district judges of the seventh judicial
district shall be established as follows:
(a) One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Madison County;
(b) One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Bingham County;
(c) Three (3) Four (4) resident chambers shall be established in Bon-
neville County;
(d) One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Jefferson County.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.